sl-SI: Gradbena oprema > Gradbeni materiali > Izolacija: Izolacijske plošče; Vpihana izolacija; Izolacija iz penaste plošče; Ohlapna izolacija; Izolacija v zvitkih; Izolacijska pena
da: Isenkram > Byggematerialer > Isolering: Bat-isolering; Indblæst isolering; Skumpladeisolering; Isolering med løst fyld; Rulleisolering; Sprayskumisolering
zh-TW: 硬體 > 建材 > 隔熱: 隔熱棉絮; 噴入式隔熱材料; 泡綿隔熱板; 噴敷用隔熱材料; 隔熱材料卷; 隔熱泡綿噴霧
pt-BR: Ferragens > Materiais de construção > Isolamento: Isolamento de batente; Isolamento soprado; Isolamento de placa de espuma; Isolamento de preenchimento solto; Isolamento de rolo; Isolamento de espuma em spray
pt-PT: Equipamento > Materiais de construção > Isolamento: Isolamento de fibras; Isolamento insuflado; Isolamento de placa de espuma; Isolamento de enchimento solto; Isolamento de rolo; Isolamento de espuma em spray
el: Υλικά κατασκευών > Οικοδομικά υλικά > Μόνωση: Μόνωση σε φύλλα; Μόνωση με εμφύσηση; Μόνωση με αφρώδη φύλλα; Μόνωση χαλαρής πλήρωσης; Ρολό μόνωσης; Μόνωση με αφρό ψεκασμού
ja: DIY用品 > 建築材料 > 断熱材: バット絶縁体; ブローイング断熱材; フォームボード断熱材; ルースフィル断熱材; ロール断熱材; スプレーフォーム断熱材
es: Bricolaje > Materiales de construcción > Aislamiento: Aislamiento de fibra de vidrio; Aislamiento soplado; Aislamiento de tablero de espuma; Aislamiento de relleno suelto; Aislamiento en rollo; Aislamiento de espuma en aerosol
hu: Hardver > Építőanyagok > Szigetelés: Üvegszálas szigetelés; Befújható szigetelés; Hablemez-szigetelés; Laza töltetű szigetelés; Tekercsszigetelés; Sprayhab-szigetelés
en: Hardware > Building Materials > Insulation: Batt Insulation; Blown-In Insulation; Foam Board Insulation; Loose-Fill Insulation; Roll Insulation; Spray Foam Insulation
th: ฮาร์ดแวร์ > วัสดุก่อสร้าง > ฉนวน: ฉนวนรุ่นแบต; ฉนวนแบบเป่าเข้า; ฉนวนโฟมบอร์ด; ฉนวนโฟมเม็ดกันกระแทก; ฉนวนม้วน; ฉนวนแบบสเปรย์โฟม
tr: Hırdavat > Yapı Malzemeleri > Yalıtım: Batt Yalıtımı; Üflemeli Yalıtım; Köpük Levha Yalıtımı; Gevşek Dolgu Yalıtımı; Rulo Yalıtımı; Sprey Köpük Yalıtımı
fi: Rakentaminen > Rakennusmateriaalit > Eristys: Villaeristys; Sisään puristettava eristys; Vaahtolevyeristys; Irtomateriaalieristys; Rullaeristys; Ruiskutettava vaahtoeriste
cs: Kutilství a řemeslo > Stavební materiály > Izolace: Vatová izolace; Foukaná izolace; Izolace z pěnových desek; Volně ložená izolace; Izolační fólie; Izolace stříkanou pěnou
ko: 철물 > 건축 자재 > 단열재: 솜 단열재; 블로우 인 단열재; 폼보드 단열재; 충전 단열재; 롤 단열재; 스프레이폼 단열재
de: Heimwerkerbedarf > Baumaterialien > Isolierung: Dämmstoffplatten; Einblasdämmung; Schaumstoffplatten-Dämmung; Lose gefüllte Isolierung; Rollenisolierung; Sprühschaumisolierung
ru: Оборудование и технические изделия > Строительные изделия > Изоляционные материалы: Минераловатная изоляция; Заливная изоляция; Изоляционные плиты из пенопласта; Засыпная изоляция; Рулонные изолирующие материалы; Распыляемая изоляционная пена
sv: Metallprodukter > Byggnadsmaterial > Isolering: Batt-isolering; Inblåst isolering; Skumskiveisolering; Lösfyllningsisolering; Rullisolering; Sprayskumisolering
it: Articoli di ferramenta > Materiali da costruzione > Isolamento: Isolamento battuta; Isolamento insufflato; Pannello isolante in schiuma; Isolamento sfuso; Isolamento a rotolo; Isolamento in schiuma spray
sk-SK: Náradie > Stavebné materiály > Izolácia: Sklená vata; Fúkaná izolácia; Penové izolačné dosky; Izolácia polystyrénovými guličkami; Samolepiaca tepelná izolácia; Striekaná penová izolácia
hr-HR: Željezarija > Građevinski materijali > Izolacija: Izolacijska vuna; Izolacija za upuhivanje; Izolacija od pjenastih ploča; Rastresita izolacija; Izolacija u roli; Izolacijska pjena u spreju
ro-RO: Feronerie > Materiale de construcții > Izolație: Izolații de tip covor flexibil; Izolație suflată; Izolație din spumă; Izolație cu umplutură liberă; Izolații de tip rulou; Izolație de tip spray cu spumă
nb: Maskinvare > Bygningsmaterialer > Isolasjon: Fiberisolasjon; Innblåst isolasjon; Skumplateisolasjon; Løsfyllisolasjon; Isolasjon på rull; Sprayskumisolasjon
nl: Bouwmaterialen > Afbouwmaterialen > Isolatie: Matisolatie; Ingeblazen isolatie; Schuimplaatisolatie; Losse isolatie; Isolatie op rol; Spuitschuimisolatie
zh-CN: 五金/硬件 > 建材 > 隔热材料: 条毯式隔热材料; 吹入式隔热材料; 泡沫板隔热材料; 松散充填隔热材料; 卷筒隔热材料; 喷涂泡沫隔热材料
vi: Phần cứng > Vật liệu xây dựng > Lớp cách nhiệt: Tấm cách ly; Lớp cách nhiệt thổi vào; Tấm xốp cách nhiệt; Lớp cách nhiệt lỏng; Cuộn cách nhiệt; Xịt foam cách nhiệt
fr: Quincaillerie > Matériaux de construction > Isolation: Isolation en batte; Isolation soufflée; Isolation en panneaux de mousse; Isolation en vrac; Isolation en rouleau; Isolation en mousse pulvérisée
bg-BG: Железария > Строителни материали > Изолация: Изолационна вата; Изолация за впръскване; Изолационни панели от пяна; Насипна изолация; Изолация на ролки; Спрей изолация от пяна
pl: Sprzęt > Materiały budowlane > Izolacje: Izolacja wełną mineralną; Izolacja wdmuchiwana; Izolacja z płyty piankowej; Izolacja luźnym wypełnieniem; Izolacja w rolce; Izolacja natryskowa pianką
lt-LT: Techninė įranga > Statybinės medžiagos > Izoliacija: Demblinė izoliacija; Įpurškiama izoliacija; Izoliacinės putplasčio plokštės; Palaido užpildymo izoliacija; Ritininė izoliacija; Purškiamoji putų izoliacija